Missouri, session 2026, HB1736.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.1754, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.1754, to read as follows:
67.1754. 1. The sales tax authorized in sections 67.1712 to 67.1721 shall be collected
and allocated as follows:
(1) Fifty percent of the sales taxes collected from each county shall be deposited in
the metropolitan park and recreational fund to be administered by the board of directors of the
district to pay costs associated with the establishment, administration, operation and
maintenance of public recreational facilities, parks, and public recreational grounds
associated with the district. Costs for office administration beginning in the second fiscal
year of district operations may be up to but shall not exceed fifteen percent of the amount
deposited pursuant to this subdivision;
(2) Fifty percent of the sales taxes collected from each county shall be returned to the
source county for park purposes, which may include storm water management projects in
such county that are confined to acquiring land for the sole purpose of building a park
or greenway or for the deployment and augmentation of natural infrastructure or
features that would otherwise add to or not take away from the benefits of the park to
the community, except that forty percent of such fifty percent amount shall be reserved for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1736 2
distribution to municipalities within the county in the form of grant revenue-sharing funds.
Each county in the district shall establish its own process for awarding the grant proceeds to
its municipalities for park purposes provided the purposes of such grants are consistent with
the purpose of the district. In the case of a county of the first classification with a charter
form of government having a population of at least nine hundred thousand inhabitants, such
grant proceeds shall be awarded to municipalities by a municipal grant commission as
described in section 67.1757; in such county, notwithstanding other provisions to the contrary,
the grant proceeds may be used to fund any recreation program or park improvement serving
municipal residents and for such other purposes as set forth in section 67.1757.
2. The sales tax authorized under subsection 2 of section 67.1712 shall be collected
and allocated as follows:
(1) Sixty percent of the sales taxes collected from all counties shall be deposited in a
separate metropolitan park and recreational fund to be administered by the board of directors
of the metropolitan district to pay costs associated with the administration, operation, and
maintenance of public recreational facilities, parks, and public recreational grounds
associated with the metropolitan district. Of this amount:
(a) For a period ending twenty years after the issuance of any bonds issued for the
purpose of improving and maintaining the Gateway Arch grounds, but no later than twenty-
three years after the effective date of the incremental sales tax as approved by voter initiative
under subsection 2 of section 67.1715:
a. Fifty percent shall be apportioned to accessibility, safety, improvement, and
maintenance of the Gateway Arch grounds; and
b. Fifty percent shall be apportioned to accessibility, safety, improvement, and
maintenance of park projects other than the Gateway Arch grounds;
(b) After the period described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision:
a. Twenty percent shall be apportioned to accessibility, safety, improvement, and
maintenance of the Gateway Arch grounds; and
b. Eighty percent shall be apportioned to accessibility, safety, improvement, and
maintenance of park projects other than the Gateway Arch grounds;
(c) Costs for office administration beginning in the second fiscal year of collection
and allocation may be up to but shall not exceed fifteen percent of the amount deposited under
this subdivision;
(2) Forty percent of the sales taxes collected from each county shall be returned to the
source county for park purposes, except that forty percent of the amount allocated to each
source county shall be reserved for distribution to municipalities within the county in the form
of grant-sharing funds. Each county in the metropolitan district shall establish its own
process for awarding the grant proceeds to its municipalities for park purposes, provided the

HB 1736 3
purposes of such grants are consistent with the purpose of the metropolitan district. In the
case of any county with a charter form of government and with more than nine hundred fifty
thousand inhabitants, such grant proceeds shall be awarded to municipalities by a municipal
grant commission as described in section 67.1757, and in such county, notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, such grant proceeds may be used to fund any recreation
program or park improvement serving municipal residents and for such other purposes as set
forth in section 67.1757.
3. At a general election occurring not less than six months before the expiration of
twenty years after issuance of any bonds issued for the purpose of improving and maintaining
the Gateway Arch grounds, but no later than twenty-three years after the effective date of the
incremental sales tax as approved by voter initiative under subsection 2 of section 67.1715,
the governing body of any county within the metropolitan district whose voters approved
such incremental tax shall submit to its voters a proposal to reauthorize such tax after the
expiration of such period. The form of the question shall be determined by the metropolitan
district. Such reauthorization shall become effective only after a majority of the voters of
each such county who vote on such reauthorization approve the reauthorization.
✔